California statutes. Education Code
 exemption, even if the pupil is no longer homeless, a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, a newcomer pupil, or the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil has terminated.

(i) If a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, a local educational agency shall not revoke the exemption.

(j) (1) If a pupil in foster care is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, the exemption shall continue to apply after the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil while the pupil is
 enrolled in school or if the pupil transfers to another school, including a charter school, or school district.

(2) If a pupil who is a homeless child or youth is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, the exemption shall continue to apply after the pupil is no longer a homeless child or youth while the pupil is enrolled in school or if the pupil transfers to another school, including a charter school, or school district.

(3) If a former juvenile court school pupil is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, the exemption shall continue to apply after the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil while the pupil is enrolled in school or if the pupil transfers to another school, including a charter school, or
 school district.

(4) If a pupil who is a child of a military family is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, the exemption shall continue to apply after the pupil no longer meets the definition of “children of military families” under Section 49701 while the pupil is enrolled in school or if the pupil transfers to another school, including a charter school, or school district.

(5) If a pupil who is a migratory child is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, the exemption shall continue to apply after the pupil no longer meets the definition of “migratory child” while the pupil is enrolled in school or if the pupil transfers to another school, including a charter school, or school district.

(6) If a newcomer pupil is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, the exemption shall continue to apply after the pupil no longer meets the definition of a
 “newcomer pupil” while the pupil is enrolled in school or if the pupil transfers to another school, including a charter school, or school district.

(k) A local educational agency shall not require or request a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, or a pupil who is a migratory child to transfer schools in order to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(l) (1) A pupil in foster care, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, the pupil’s social worker, or the pupil’s probation officer shall not request a transfer solely to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(2) A pupil who is a homeless child or youth, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, or the local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall not request a transfer solely to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(3) A former juvenile court school pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, the pupil’s social worker, or the pupil’s probation officer shall not request a transfer solely to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(4) A pupil who is a child of a military family, or the pupil’s parent or
 guardian, shall not request a transfer solely to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(5) A pupil who is a migratory child, or the pupil’s parent or guardian, shall not request a transfer solely to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(m) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1
 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to, among others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(n) (1) If a local
 educational agency determines that a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, or a pupil who is a migratory child and who transfers between schools any time after the completion of the pupil’s second year of high school, or a newcomer pupil who is in their third or fourth year of high school, is not reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements within the pupil’s fifth year of high school, but is reasonably able to complete the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3 within the pupil’s fifth year of high school, the local educational agency shall exempt a pupil from the local educational agency’s graduation requirements and provide the pupil the option to remain in school for a fifth year to complete the statewide coursework requirements.
 The local educational agency shall consult with the pupil and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil regarding all of the following:

(A) The pupil’s option to remain in school for a fifth year to complete the statewide coursework requirements.

(B) How waiving the local educational requirements and remaining in school for a fifth year may affect the pupil’s postsecondary education or vocation plans, including the ability to gain admission to an institution of higher education.

(C) Whether any other options are available to the pupil, including, but not limited to, possible credit recovery, and any transfer opportunities available through the California Community Colleges.

(D) The pupil’s academic data and any other information relevant to making an informed decision on whether to accept the exemption and option to remain in school for a fifth year to complete the statewide coursework requirements.

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.

(o) (1) If a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, or a pupil who is a migratory child is not eligible for an exemption pursuant to this section in the year in which the pupil transfers between schools, or for a newcomer pupil, is not eligible for an exemption pursuant to this section in the pupil’s
 third year of high school, because the local educational agency makes a finding that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school, a local educational agency nonetheless shall reevaluate eligibility and provide written notice to the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil’s social worker or probation officer, if applicable, whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption within the first 30 calendar days of the following academic year, based on the course completion status of the pupil at the time of reevaluation to determine if the pupil continues to be reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year
 of high school.

(2) If it is determined within the first 30 calendar days of the following academic year, that given their course completion status at that time of the reevaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) that the pupil is not reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements in time to graduate
 from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school, the local educational agency shall provide the pupil with the option to receive an exemption from all coursework and other requirements adopted by the governing body of the local educational agency that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3 or to stay in school for a fifth year to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements upon agreement with the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, or, if the pupil is under 18 years of age, upon agreement with the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil and provide notification of the availability of these options pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (d).

(p) (1) This section shall apply to a pupil in
 foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil, who is enrolled in an adult education program, regardless of the pupil’s age.

(2) This section shall apply to a pupil who is enrolled in an adult education program who, while enrolled in high school, was a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil.

(q) For a pupil who is an unaccompanied youth as defined in Section 11434a(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the “person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil”
 is the unaccompanied youth.

(r) If a local educational agency or adult school offers to exempt a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil from all coursework and other requirements adopted by the governing body of the local educational agency that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3, it is in the sole discretion of the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, or the pupil themselves if they are 18 years of age or older, an unaccompanied youth as defined in Section 11434a(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or an unaccompanied minor who holds their own education rights, whether to accept the exemption,
 based on the pupil’s best educational interests.

(s) Each local educational agency shall report to the department annually on the number of pupils who, for the prior school year, graduated with an exemption from the local educational agency’s graduation requirements that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements. This data shall be reported for pupils graduating in the fourth year and fifth year cohorts, and shall be
 disaggregated by cohort, pupil category, race, and disability status. The department shall make this data publicly available on an annual basis aligned with other reporting timelines for the California dashboard graduation data. For purposes of this subdivision, “pupil category” means the categories of pupils identified in subdivision (a).

(t) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Governing body” means the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school, as applicable.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district or charter school.

(3) “Pupil in foster
 care” has the same meaning as foster child, defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5.

(4) “School” means a public school, including a charter school, that maintains any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(5) “Unaccompanied youth” means an unaccompanied youth between 12 to 24 years of age, inclusive, who is experiencing homelessness, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   (AB 714)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Former juvenile court school pupil” means a pupil who, upon completion of the pupil’s second year of high school, transfers to a school district or charter school, excluding a school district operated by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, from a juvenile court school.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) “Newcomer pupil” has the same meaning as “immigrant children and youth,”
 as defined in Section 7011(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(4) “Partial coursework satisfactorily completed” includes any portion of an individual course, even if the pupil did not complete the entire course.

(5) “Pupil in foster care” has the same meaning as “foster child,” as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5.

(6) “Pupil who is a child of a military family” means a pupil who meets the definition of “children of military families” under Section 49701.

(7) “Pupil who is a homeless child or youth” means a pupil who meets the definition of “homeless children and youths” in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States
 Code.

(8) “Pupil who is a migratory child” means a pupil who meets the definition of “currently migratory child” under subdivision (a) of Section 54441.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall issue, and the new local educational agency shall accept, full or partial credit for all full or partial coursework satisfactorily completed by a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil, while attending a public school, a juvenile court school, a charter school, a school in a country other than the United States, or a nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(2) The transferring local educational agency shall issue the full and partial credits on an official transcript for the pupil and shall ensure the transcript includes all of the following:

(A) All full and partial credits and grades earned based on any measure of full or partial coursework being satisfactorily completed, including a determination of the days of enrollment or seat time, or both, if applicable, at a school of that local educational agency or a prior local educational agency, or any other public school, juvenile court school, charter school, school in a country other than the United States, or nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(B) The credits and grades for each school and local educational agency listed
 separately so it is clear where they were earned.

(C) A complete record of the pupil’s seat time, including both period attendance and days of enrollment.

(3) The new local educational agency shall transfer the credits and grades onto an official transcript of the new local educational agency for the pupil in the same manner as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) and pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (c).

(4) If the new school or new local educational agency has knowledge that the transcript from the transferring local educational agency may not include certain credits or grades for the pupil, it shall contact the prior local educational agency within two business days to request that the prior local
 educational agency issue full or partial credits pursuant to this paragraph. The prior local educational agency shall issue appropriate credits and provide all academic and other records to the new local educational agency within two business days of the request.

(5) For purposes of coursework completed by a pupil who is a child of a military family, “public school” includes schools operated by the United States Department of Defense.

(c) (1) The credits accepted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be applied for enrollment purposes as specified in subdivision (d) to the same or equivalent course, if applicable, as the coursework completed in the prior public school, juvenile court school, charter school, school in a country other than the United States, or nonpublic,
 nonsectarian school.

(2) For purposes of the official transcript, the credits accepted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be added to the credits earned from the same or equivalent course for purposes of calculating the total credits earned for the course but shall separately identify the school and local educational agency in which the credits were earned.

(d) A local educational agency shall not require a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil to retake a course if the pupil has satisfactorily completed the entire course in a public school, a juvenile court school, a charter school, a school in a country other than the
 United States, or a nonpublic, nonsectarian school. If the pupil did not complete the entire course, the local educational agency shall not require the pupil to retake the portion of the course the pupil completed unless the local educational agency, in consultation with the holder of educational rights for the pupil, finds that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the requirements in time to graduate from high school. When partial credit is awarded in a particular course, the pupil in foster care, the pupil who is a homeless child or youth, the former juvenile court school pupil, the pupil who is a child of a military family, the pupil who is a migratory child, or the newcomer pupil shall be enrolled in the same or equivalent course, if applicable, so that the pupil may continue and complete the entire course.

(e) A pupil in foster care,
 a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil shall not be prevented from retaking or taking a course to meet the eligibility requirements for admission to the California State University or the University of California.

(f) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant
 to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or if the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to, among others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 342, Sec. 3.   (AB 714)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.25.

(a) A “pupil participating in a newcomer program,” as defined in Section 51225.2, as that section read on January 1, 2023, who was enrolled before January 1, 2024, is entitled to the rights in Sections 51225.1 and 51225.2.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a local educational agency may, in its discretion, extend the rights in Sections 51225.1 and 51225.2 to a “pupil participating in a newcomer program,” as defined in Section 51225.2, as that section read on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.   (AB 2473)   Effective September 28, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.3.

(a) A pupil shall complete all of the following while in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in order to receive a diploma of graduation from high school:

(1) At least the following numbers of courses in the subjects specified, each course having a duration of one year, unless otherwise specified:

(A) Three courses in English.

(B) Two courses in mathematics. If the governing board of a school district requires more than two courses in mathematics for graduation, the governing board of the school district may award a pupil up to one mathematics course credit pursuant to Section 51225.35.

(C) Two courses in science, including biological and physical sciences.

(D) Three courses in social studies, including United States history and geography; world history, culture, and geography; a one-semester course in American government and civics; and a one-semester course in economics.

(E) One course in visual or performing arts, world language, or career technical education.

(i) For purposes of satisfying the requirement specified in this subparagraph, a course in American Sign Language shall be deemed a course in world language.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “a course in career technical education” means a course in a district-operated career technical education program that is aligned to the career technical model curriculum standards and framework adopted by the state board, including courses through a regional occupational center or program operated by a county superintendent of schools or pursuant to a joint powers agreement.

(iii) This subparagraph does not require a school or school district that currently does not offer career technical education courses to start new career technical education programs for purposes of this section.

(iv) If a school district or county office of education elects to allow a career technical education course to satisfy the requirement imposed by this subparagraph, the governing board of the school
 district or county office of education, before offering that alternative to pupils, shall notify parents, teachers, pupils, and the public at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of all of the following:

(I) The intent to offer career technical education courses to fulfill the graduation requirement specified in this subparagraph.

(II) The impact that offering career technical education courses, pursuant to this subparagraph, will have on the availability of courses that meet the eligibility requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California, and whether the career technical education courses to be offered pursuant to this subparagraph are approved to satisfy those eligibility requirements. If a school district elects to allow a career technical education course to satisfy the requirement imposed by this subparagraph, the
 school district shall comply with subdivision (l) of Section 48980.

(III) The distinction, if any, between the high school graduation requirements of the school district or county office of education, and the eligibility requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(F) Two courses in physical education, unless the pupil has been exempted pursuant to this code.

(G) (i) Commencing with pupils graduating in the 2029–30 school year, including for pupils enrolled in a charter school, a one-semester course in ethnic studies. A local educational agency, including a charter school, may require a full-year course in ethnic studies at its discretion. Commencing with the 2025–26 school year, a local educational agency, including a charter school, with
 pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall offer at least a one-semester course in ethnic studies.

(ii) Subject to the course offerings of a local educational agency, including a charter school, a pupil may fulfill the requirement of clause (i) through the completion of any of the following types of courses:

(I) A course based on the model curriculum developed pursuant to Section 51226.7.

(II) An existing ethnic studies course.

(III) An ethnic studies course taught as part of a course that has been approved as meeting the A–G requirements of the University of California and the California State University.

(IV) A locally developed ethnic studies course approved by the governing board of
 the school district or the governing body of the charter school. The proposed course shall first be presented at a public meeting of the governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school, and shall not be approved until a subsequent public meeting of the governing board or governing body at which the public has had the opportunity to express its views on the proposed course.

(iii) A course that does not use ethnic studies content as the primary content through which the subject is taught shall not be used to satisfy the requirement of clause (i).

(iv) A pupil completing a course described in clause (ii) shall also accrue credit for coursework in the subject that the course is offered, including, if applicable, credit toward satisfying a course required for a diploma of graduation from high school pursuant to this section.

(v) Curriculum, instruction, and instructional materials for a course described in clause (ii) shall meet all of the following requirements:

(I) Be appropriate for use with pupils of all races, religions, nationalities, genders, sexual orientations, and diverse ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and English learners.

(II) Not reflect or promote, directly or indirectly, any bias, bigotry, or discrimination against any person or group of persons on the basis of any category protected by Section 220.

(III) Not teach or promote religious doctrine.

(vi) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies, including charter schools, consider that, pursuant to
 Section 51226.7, the Instructional Quality Commission undertook a lengthy, thorough, deliberative, and inclusive process before submitting a model curriculum in ethnic studies to the state board. To the extent that local educational agencies, including charter schools, choose to locally develop an ethnic studies program for approval by their governing board or governing body, it is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies not use the portions of the draft model curriculum that were not adopted by the Instructional Quality Commission due to concerns related to bias, bigotry, and discrimination.

(vii) The amendments made to this section by Section 1 of Chapter 661 of the Statutes of 2021 shall not be construed to alter any other requirement of this section for pupils enrolled in a charter school.

(H) (i) Commencing with pupils graduating in
 the 2030–31 school year, including for pupils enrolled in a charter school, a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance, that shall not be combined with any other course.

(ii) Commencing with pupils graduating in the 2030–31 school year, a local educational agency may exempt a pupil who completes a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance, that is not combined with any other course, from the requirement to complete a one-semester course in economics pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(iii) (I) A local educational agency may elect to eliminate one or more locally required courses established pursuant to paragraph (2) in order to accommodate the requirement that pupils, commencing with pupils graduating in the 2030–31 school year, complete a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance.

(II) This clause does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(iv) Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a local educational agency, including a charter school, with pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall offer in all of its high schools at least a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance, that is not combined with any other course.

(v) To satisfy the requirement of this subparagraph, a separate, stand-alone one-semester course in personal finance shall include information for pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, on all of, and only, the topics listed in paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 51284.5.

(2) (A) Other coursework
 requirements adopted by the governing board of the school district.

(B) The governing board of a school district may, at its discretion, adopt a policy to exempt pupils from any coursework requirements adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A). It is the intent of the Legislature that the policy include a consultation with the pupil and the educational rights holder for the pupil regarding any impact of not fulfilling locally required coursework on the pupil’s ability to gain admission to an institution of higher education.

(C) This paragraph does not affect a pupil’s rights pursuant to Section 51225.1 or 51225.31.

(b) The governing board, with the active involvement of parents, administrators, teachers, and pupils, shall adopt alternative means for pupils to complete the prescribed course of study that may include
 practical demonstration of skills and competencies, supervised work experience or other outside school experience, career technical education classes offered in high schools, courses offered by regional occupational centers or programs, interdisciplinary study, independent study, and credit earned at a postsecondary educational institution. Requirements for graduation and specified alternative modes for completing the prescribed course of study shall be made available to pupils, parents, and the public.

(c) On or before July 1, 2017, the department shall submit a comprehensive report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature on the addition of career technical education courses to satisfy the requirement specified in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the following information:

(1) A comparison of the pupil enrollment
 in career technical education courses, world language courses, and visual and performing arts courses for the 2005–06 to 2011–12 school years, inclusive, to the pupil enrollment in career technical education courses, world language courses, and visual and performing arts courses for the 2012–13 to 2016–17 school years, inclusive.

(2) The reasons, reported by school districts, that pupils give for choosing to enroll in a career technical education course to satisfy the requirement specified in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) The type and number of career technical education courses that were conducted for the 2005–06 to 2011–12 school years, inclusive, compared to the type and number of career technical education courses that were conducted for the 2012–13 to 2016–17 school years, inclusive.

(4) The number of career technical education courses that satisfied the subject matter requirements for admission to the University of California or the California State University.

(5) The extent to which the career technical education courses chosen by pupils are aligned with the California Career Technical Education Model Curriculum Standards, and prepare pupils for employment, advanced training, and postsecondary education.

(6) The number of career technical education courses that also satisfy the visual and performing arts requirement, and the number of career technical education courses that also satisfy the world language requirement.

(7) Annual pupil dropout and graduation rates for the 2011–12 to 2014–15 school years, inclusive.

(d) For purposes of completing the report described in subdivision (c), the Superintendent may use existing state resources and federal funds. If state or federal funds are not available or sufficient, the Superintendent may apply for and accept grants, and receive donations and other financial support from public or private sources for purposes of this section.

(e) For purposes of completing the report described in subdivision (c), the Superintendent may accept support, including, but not limited to, financial and technical support, from high school reform advocates, teachers, chamber organizations, industry representatives, research centers, parents, and pupils.

(f) The amendments made to this section by Section 1 of Chapter 661 of the Statutes of 2021 shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for purposes of these amendments in
 the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 45) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (AB 821)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.31.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall exempt an individual with exceptional needs who satisfies the eligibility criteria described in subdivision (b) from all courses and other requirements adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency that are additional to the statewide course requirements specified in Section 51225.3 and shall award the pupil a diploma of graduation from high school, as described in Section 7801(23)(A)(ii)(I)(bb) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) The award of a diploma of graduation from high school pursuant to this subdivision, in accordance with Section 300.102(a)(3) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, does not change a local educational
 agency’s obligation to provide a free appropriate public education, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 56026, or otherwise constitute a change in placement.

(b) An individual with exceptional needs, who entered ninth grade in the 2022–23 school year or later, shall be eligible for the exemption and award described in subdivision (a) if their individualized education program provides for all of the following:

(1) The pupil’s individualized education program team has deemed the pupil eligible to take the state alternate assessments as described in subdivision (k) of Section 60640.

(2) The pupil is required to complete state standards aligned coursework to meet the statewide course requirements specified in Section 51225.3.

(c) An individual with
 exceptional needs who meets the criteria for the diploma pursuant to this section shall be eligible to participate in any graduation ceremony and any school activity related to graduation with their grade-level peers with and without disabilities. Participation in graduation activities that are subject to this section shall not be construed as termination of the provision of a free appropriate public education for pupils described in Section 56026, consistent with Section 300.102(a)(3)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, unless the individualized education program team, which includes the parent and pupil, as defined in Sections 300.320 and 300.321 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, has determined the pupil has completed their high school experience.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” includes a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall not be subject to waiver by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or by the Superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 60.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.32.

(a) (1) A local educational agency may exempt an individual with exceptional needs who was enrolled in grade 10 or higher in the 2022–23 school year, and who, while eligible pursuant to Section 56026, satisfies all the eligibility criteria described in subdivision (b) from all courses and requirements adopted by the governing board or body of the local educational agency that are additional to the statewide course requirements specified in Section 51225.3 and may award the pupil a diploma of graduation from high school, as described in Section 7801(23)(A)(ii)(I)(bb) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(2) The award of a diploma of graduation from high school pursuant to this subdivision, in accordance with Section
 300.102(a)(3) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, does not change a local educational agency’s obligation to provide a free appropriate public education, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 56026, or otherwise constitute a change in placement.

(b) An individual with exceptional needs, who was enrolled in grade 10 or higher in the 2022–23 school year and is currently eligible pursuant to Section 56026, may be eligible for the exemption and award described in subdivision (a) if their individualized education program provides for all of the following:

(1) The pupil’s individualized education program team has deemed the pupil eligible to take the state alternate assessments as described in subdivision (k) of Section 60640.

(2) The pupil is required to complete state standards aligned coursework to meet
 the statewide course requirements specified in Section 51225.3.

(c) An individual with exceptional needs who meets the criteria for the diploma pursuant to this section shall be eligible to participate in any graduation ceremony and any school activity related to graduation with their grade-level peers with and without disabilities. Participation in graduation activities that are subject to this section shall not be construed as termination of the provision of a free appropriate public education for pupils described in Section 56026, consistent with Section 300.102(a)(3)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, unless the individualized education program team, which includes the parent and pupil, as defined in Sections 300.320 and 300.321 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, has determined the pupil has completed their high school experience.

(d) For purposes
 of this section, “local educational agency” includes a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031, and, as of January 1, 2032, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 61.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.33.
